Washington statutes.
RCW 44.16.010

Examination of witnesses—Compulsory process.

Every chair or presiding member of any committee of either the senate or house of representatives, or any joint committee of the senate or house of representatives, which, by the terms of its appointment, shall be authorized to send for persons and papers, shall have power, under the direction of such committee, to issue compulsory process for the attendance of any witness within the state whom the committee may wish to examine.

[ 2009 c 549 s 6003; 1895 c 6 s 1; RRS s 8178.]